District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-1951

Purchasing.

Repealed.

History

May 13, 1977, D.C. Law 1-134, title V, § 501, 24 DCR 406
June 30, 1978, D.C. Law 2-89, § 2, 24 DCR 9756
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 402, 43 DCR 4962

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-251.
1973 Ed., § 32-1351.

Emergency Legislation

See notes following § 44-1901.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(a) of the Confirmation Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-25, March 15, 1999, 46 DCR 2971).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 301(b) of the Police Officers, Fire Fighters, and Teachers Retirement Benefit Replacement Plan and Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Act of 1997 Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-351, May 20, 1998, 45 DCR 3673), and § 301(b) of the Police Officers, Fire Fighters, and Teachers Retirement Benefit Replacement Plan and Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Act of 1997 Technical Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-432, August 6, 1998, 45 DCR 5920).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 4 of the Establishment of Council Contract Review Criteria and Budget Support Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-500, December 2, 1998, __ DCR __).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 1-134, title V, § 502, eff. May 13, 1977, added this section.

D.C. Law 11-212, title IV, § 402 ( 43 DCR 4962), eff. April 9, 1997, provided: “The D.C. General Hospital Commission Act, effective May 13, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-134; D.C. Code § 32-201 et seq. [1981 Ed.]), is repealed.”

Title V, § 501(c) of D.C. Law 11-212, provided: “(c) Section 402 shall become effective upon the first meeting of the Board pursuant to section 204(h).”

D.C. Law 11-259, title III, § 315(b) ( 44 DCR 1423), eff. April 15, 1997, also repealed § 32-251 [1981 Ed.].